Utah statutes.
78A-2-218.   Powers of every judicial officer -- Contempt.

Every judicial officer has power:

(1)  to preserve and enforce order in his immediate presence, and in proceedings before him, when he is engaged in the performance of official duty;

(2)  to compel obedience to his lawful orders as provided by law;

(3)  to compel the attendance of persons to testify in a proceeding before him in the cases and manner provided by law;

(4)  to administer oaths to persons in a proceeding pending before him, and in all other cases where it may be necessary in the exercise of his powers and duties; and

(5)  punish for contempt as provided by law to enforce compliance with Subsections (1) through (4).

